Tennessee, session 114, HB1528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-5-106, is amended by deleting
subsections (c) and (d) and substituting:
(c)
(1) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, the right to institute and
the right to collect any proceeds from a wrongful death action granted by this
section to a surviving spouse shall be waived, if the children or next of kin
establish the surviving spouse has abandoned the deceased spouse as
described in § 36-4-101(a)(13) or otherwise willfully withdrawn for a period of
three (3) years.
(2) If the period of three (3) years has passed since the time of
abandonment or willful withdrawal, then there is created a rebuttable
presumption that the surviving spouse abandoned the deceased spouse for
purposes of this section.
(3) In an action under this section, the child or next of kin shall serve the
surviving spouse with process as provided in the rules of civil procedure or by
substituted, constructive, or other service as may otherwise be provided by law.
(d) As used in this section, the word "person" includes an unborn child as
defined in § 63-6-1102.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1528
010774
- 1 -